Nebraska, session 109, LB27.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created.
The fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under
subdivision (2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for services
addressing the health needs of adults and children under the Medical
Assistance Act, including filling service gaps, providing system
improvements, providing evidence-based early intervention home visitation
programs, providing medical respite services, translation and
interpretation services, providing coverage for continuous glucose
monitors as described in section 68-911, providing other services
sustaining access to care, the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, and
providing grants pursuant to the Intergenerational Care Facility
Incentive Grant Program, and providing loan repayments under the Rural
Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act as determined by the
Legislature. The fund shall only be used for the purposes described in
this section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 71-5650, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-5650 Sections 71-5650 to 71-5670 and section 7 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Rural Health Systems and Professional
Incentive Act.
Sec. 3. Section 71-5652, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
71-5652 The purposes of the Rural Health Systems and Professional
Incentive Act are to:
(1) Create create the Nebraska Rural Health Advisory Commission and
establish its powers and duties; ,
(2) Establish establish a student loan program that will provide
financial incentives to medical, dental, master's level and doctorate-
level mental health, and physician assistant students who agree to
practice their profession in a designated health profession shortage area
within Nebraska; ,
(3) Establish establish a loan repayment program that will provide
financial incentives to medical residents who agree to practice their
profession in a designated health profession shortage area within
Nebraska; , and
(4) Establish establish a loan repayment program that will require
community matching funds and will provide financial incentives to
eligible health professionals who agree to practice their profession in a
designated health profession shortage area within Nebraska; and .
(5) Establish a loan repayment program for certain dentists who
provide dental services to medicaid patients.
Sec. 4. Section 71-5662, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5662 (1) To be eligible for a student loan under the Rural Health
Systems and Professional Incentive Act, an applicant or a recipient shall
be enrolled or accepted for enrollment in an accredited medical or dental
education program or physician assistant education program or an approved
mental health practice program in Nebraska.
(2) To be eligible for the medical resident incentive under the act,
an applicant or a recipient shall be enrolled or accepted for enrollment
in an approved medical specialty residency program in Nebraska.
(3) To be eligible for loan repayment under the act, an applicant or
a recipient shall be a pharmacist, a dentist, a physical therapist, an
-3-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
occupational therapist, a mental health practitioner, a psychologist
licensed under the requirements of section 38-3114 or the equivalent
thereof, a nurse practitioner, a physician assistant, a psychiatrist, or
a physician in an approved specialty and shall:
(a) Be be licensed to practice in Nebraska; ,
(b) Not not be enrolled in a residency program; ,
(c) Not not be practicing under a provisional or temporary
license; , and
(d) Except as provided pursuant to an agreement under section 7 of
this act, enter practice in a designated health profession shortage area
in Nebraska.
Sec. 5. Section 71-5663, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5663 (1) The amount of financial assistance provided through
student loans pursuant to the Rural Health Systems and Professional
Incentive Act shall be limited to thirty thousand dollars for each
recipient for each academic year and, except as provided in subdivision
(4)(a) of this section, shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per medical, dental, or doctorate-level mental health student or
thirty thousand dollars per master's level mental health or physician
assistant student.
(2) The amount of financial assistance provided through the medical
resident incentive program pursuant to the act shall be limited to forty
thousand dollars for each recipient for each year of residency and,
except as provided in subdivision (4)(b) of this section, shall not
exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars.
(3) The amount of financial assistance provided by the state through
loan repayments pursuant to the act is limited as follows:
(a) For dentists pursuant to section 7 of this act, up to sixty
thousand dollars per recipient per year of full-time practice and up to a
maximum of three hundred thousand dollars per recipient;
-4-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
(b) For for physicians, psychiatrists, dentists, and psychologists,
up shall be limited to thirty thousand dollars per recipient per year of
full-time practice in a designated health profession shortage area and,
except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of this section, up to a maximum
of shall not exceed ninety thousand dollars per recipient; and
(c) For (b) for physician assistants, nurse practitioners,
pharmacists, physical therapists, occupational therapists, and mental
health practitioners, up shall be limited to fifteen thousand dollars per
recipient per year of full-time practice in a designated health
profession shortage area and, except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of
this section, up to a maximum of shall not exceed forty-five thousand
dollars per recipient.
(4)(a) The total amount of financial assistance provided through
student loans for a doctorate-level mental health student or master's
level mental health student shall be the full amount of such loans for a
person who practices psychiatry, psychology, or mental health practice:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession
shortage area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment
of members of the community supervision population.
(b) The total amount of financial assistance provided through the
medical resident incentive program for a psychiatrist shall be the full
amount of such psychiatrist's qualified educational debts if such person
practices psychiatry:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession
shortage area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment
of members of the community supervision population.
(c) The total amount of financial assistance provided through loan
repayments pursuant to the act for psychiatrists, psychologists, and
mental health practitioners shall be the full amount of such person's
-5-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
qualified educational debts if such person practices psychiatry,
psychology, or mental health practice:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession
shortage area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment
of members of the community supervision population.
(5) For purposes of this section, community supervision population
means persons on probation, post-release supervision, and pretrial
release.
Sec. 6. Section 71-5668, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5668 Except as otherwise provided in section 7 of this act, a
Each loan repayment recipient shall execute an agreement with the
department and a local entity. Such agreement shall be exempt from the
requirements of the State Procurement Act and shall include, at a
minimum, the following terms:
(1) The loan repayment recipient agrees to practice his or her
profession, and a physician, psychiatrist, dentist, nurse practitioner,
or physician assistant also agrees to practice an approved specialty, in
a designated health profession shortage area for at least three years, or
the period required by subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663, and to
accept medicaid patients in his or her practice;
(2) In consideration of the agreement by the recipient, the State of
Nebraska and a local entity within the designated health profession
shortage area will provide equal funding for the repayment of the
recipient's qualified educational debts except as provided in subdivision
(5) of this section, in amounts up to thirty thousand dollars per year
per recipient for physicians, psychiatrists, dentists, and psychologists
and up to fifteen thousand dollars per year per recipient for physician
assistants, nurse practitioners, pharmacists, physical therapists,
occupational therapists, and mental health practitioners toward qualified
-6-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
educational debts for up to three years or a longer period as required by
subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663. The department shall make payments
directly to the recipient;
(3) If the loan repayment recipient discontinues practice in the
shortage area prior to completion of the three-year requirement or the
period required by subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663, as applicable,
the recipient shall repay to the state one hundred fifty percent of the
total amount of funds provided to the recipient for loan repayment with
interest at a rate of eight percent simple interest per year from the
date of default. Upon repayment by the recipient to the department, the
department shall reimburse the local entity its share of the funds which
shall not be more than the local entity's share paid to the loan
repayment recipient;
(4) Any practice or payment obligation incurred by the loan
repayment recipient under the loan repayment program is canceled in the
event of the loan repayment recipient's death or total and permanent
disability or death;
(5) For a loan repayment recipient seeking benefits under
subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663, the recipient agrees to such other
terms as the department deems appropriate; and
(6) Beginning on July 1, 2022, any agreements entered into by
December 31, 2024, shall first use federal funds from the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 for the purposes of repaying qualified
educational debts prior to using any state or local funds. Agreements
using federal funds from the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
shall not require equal funding from a local entity. Any federal funds
from the act committed to agreements during this time period shall be
used by December 31, 2026.
Sec. 7. (1) In lieu of the agreement required by section 71-5668, a
loan repayment recipient may execute an agreement with the department
under this section if such loan repayment recipient is a dentist who:
-7-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
(a) Has practiced dentistry for less than five years at the time of
entering into such agreement; and
(b) Has not received any prior financial assistance under the Rural
Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act.
(2) An agreement under this section shall be exempt from the
requirements of the State Procurement Act and shall include, at a
minimum, the following terms:
(a) The loan repayment recipient agrees to:
(i) Practice dentistry for five years in the State of Nebraska
beginning on the date of the agreement; and
(ii) Provide dental services for not less than the number or
percentage of medicaid patients determined by the commission. Such number
or percentage shall be included in the agreement;
(b)(i) The department shall make payments directly to the recipient
for the repayment of the recipient's qualified educational debts in
amounts up to sixty thousand dollars per year per recipient for up to
five years; and
(ii) The recipient shall prove to the commission that all of such
payments have been used to pay for the qualified educational debts of the
recipient. The commission shall specify in the agreement the manner in
which a recipient can comply with this subdivision;
(c) If the loan repayment recipient breaches any term of the
agreement specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection:
(i) The recipient shall pay to the state one hundred percent of the
total amount of money provided to the recipient under the agreement with
interest. Such interest shall begin on the date the recipient breached
any term of the agreement and be calculated at a rate of eight percent
simple interest per year; and
(ii) The state shall not be obligated to pay any additional money
under the agreement to the recipient; and
(d) Any practice or payment obligation incurred by the loan
-8-

LB27 LB27
2025 2025
repayment recipient under the agreement is canceled in the event of the
loan repayment recipient's death or total and permanent disability.
(3) The department shall only make a loan repayment under this
section with money that has been specifically appropriated for such
purpose.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million
five hundred thousand dollars from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess
Profit Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 to the Department of Health and Human
Services for the purpose of making one or more loan repayments under this
section.
Sec. 8. Original sections 71-5650 and 71-5652, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 68-996, 71-5662, 71-5663, and 71-5668,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-9-